Washington statutes.
RCW 43.155.165

Statewide broadband account.

(1) The statewide broadband account is created in the state treasury. Moneys received from appropriations by the legislature, the proceeds of bond sales when authorized by the legislature, repayment of loans, or any other lawful source must be deposited into the account for uses consistent with this section. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) Expenditures from the account may be used only:

(a) For grant and loan awards made under RCW 43.155.160, including costs incurred by the board to administer RCW 43.155.160;

(b) To contract for data acquisition, a statewide broadband demand assessment, or gap analysis;

(c) To supplement revenues raised by bonds sold by local governments for broadband infrastructure development; or

(d) To provide for state match requirements under federal law.

(3) The board must maintain separate accounting for any federal funds in the account.

(4) The definitions in RCW 43.330.530 apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

[ 2019 c 365 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 365: See note following RCW 43.330.532.